Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:The legislature finds that:(1) In the context of modern medicine, ibogaine has shown promising potential as a treatment for opioid use disorder. Ibogaine is a naturally occurring psychoactive substance found in the root bark of the Tabernanthe iboga plant, native to West Africa. It has been traditionally used in spiritual ceremonies by the Bwiti people of Gabon. Compared to traditional opioid replacement therapies, ibogaine appears to have the unique ability to rapidly reduce withdrawal symptoms and cravings associated with opioid addiction, often after just a single dose. This effect is thought to be due to ibogaine's complex pharmacological profile, which includes interactions with multiple neurotransmitter systems.(2) Opioid use disorder remains a significant public health crisis with high rates of morbidity, mortality, and relapse. Standard treatments, including methadone, buprenorphine, and psychosocial therapies, often yield limited long-term success with high rates of relapse.(3) Despite its potential, ibogaine remains largely understudied due to its classification as a Schedule I controlled substance in the United States, which significantly restricts research opportunities. However, the ongoing opioid crisis underscores the urgent need for innovative treatments. Studying ibogaine may lead to the development of safer, more effective therapies for opioid use disorder. The state of Washington has already invested funds to examine cardiac safety concerns relating to ibogaine, finding that when given in a medical context, there is very little risk. Ibogaine may represent a powerful life-saving tool for helping those struggling with opioid use disorder.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) The University of Washington must conduct a prospective, randomized cohort study over a three-year period to determine the extent to which ibogaine-assisted therapy conducted through a licensed clinic in Mexico, followed by structured therapeutic support, presents advantages over treatment as usual for adults diagnosed with opioid use disorder compared to the current standard United States interventions of medication-assisted treatment and psychotherapy. The study must measure outcomes including, but not limited to, treatment engagement, reduction in opioid use, mortality, functional status, craving, motivation to change, and self-efficacy, using toxicology, standard scales, and other creditable research techniques.(2) By addressing this critical gap in opioid use disorder treatment research, the study shall aim to pave the way for larger trials and development of innovative treatments for individuals unresponsive to current therapies, creating new, effective, life-saving options for this challenging population.--- END ---